South Dakota, session 2026, SB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 31-4-156 be AMENDED:
31-4-156. The state trunk highway system includes the following in Butte,
Lawrence, Meade, Ziebach, Haakon, Stanley, Hughes, Hyde, Buffalo, Jerauld, Sanborn,
Miner, Lake, and Moody counties:
(1) From a point on the Wyoming state line southeasterly to Interstate Highway 90;
(2) From a point on Interstate Highway 90 easterly via Sturgis to U.S. Highway 14;
(3) From a point on U.S. Highway 14 in Pierre, thence easterly via Pierre, Wessington
Springs, Lane, Woonsocket, Artesian, Roswell, Vilas and Howard to U.S. Highway
81; and
(4) From a point on U.S. Highway 81 at Madison easterly via Madison, Colman, and
Egan to the Minnesota state line.
Section 2. That § 31-4-235 be AMENDED:
31-4-235. The state trunk highway system includes the following in Fall River,
Custer, Pennington, and Lawrence counties:
(1) From a point on the Nebraska state line in section eighteen, township twelve south,
range eight east, thence north via Oelrichs to U.S. Highway 18 west of the
northeast corner of section thirteen, township ten south, range seven east;
(2) From a point on U.S. Highway 18 in Hot Springs in section twenty-four, township
seven south, range five east, thence north via Hot Springs near the east-west
sixteenth line in the north half of section twenty-four, township six south, range
five east;

26.480.10 2 27
(3) From a point on the west boundary of Wind Cave National Park near the northwest
corner of section thirty-five, township five south, range five east, thence
northwesterly via Pringle and Custer to U.S. Highway 16 in Custer in section
twenty-six, township three south, range four east; and
(4) From U.S. Highway 16 in the northwest quarter of section twenty-two, township
one south, range five east, thence northwesterly to U.S. Highway 85 near the north
section line of section thirty-four, township five north, range three east.
SB27 ENROLLED

26.480.10 3 27
An Act to revise the description of certain highways included in the state trunk highway
system.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 27
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 27 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB27 ENROLLED